Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-3310
Additions; plat; vacation of part; rights of owners.

When any part of a plat shall be vacated as provided in section 18-3308, the owners of the lots so vacated may enclose the streets, alleys, and public grounds adjoining such lots in equal proportions.

Laws 1879, § 110, p. 235;

R.S.1913, § 5098;

C.S.1922, § 4271;

C.S.1929, § 17-420;

R.S.1943, § 17-421;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-421;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 321.

Vacated streets are the property of the proprietors of adjoining lots. City of Ord v. Zlomke, 181 Neb. 573, 149 N.W.2d 747 (1967).

Effect of vacation of plat of street is discussed and determined. Dell v. City of Lincoln, 170 Neb. 176, 102 N.W.2d 62 (1960).

Constitutionality of this section stated not to be involved. Village of Hay Springs v. Hay Springs Commercial Co., 131 Neb. 170, 267 N.W. 398 (1936).